Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1709.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 2005-I. Employment certification for adjunct and part-time faculty.(a) Lecture or classroom time. --A public institution of higher education shall, in completing the employer portion of the employment certification form, credit an adjunct or part-time faculty member with at least 3.35 hours worked for each hour of lecture or classroom time.(b) Noninstructional faculty.--In completing the employer 1234567891011121314151617181920 portion of the employment certification form for an adjunct or part-time faculty member with noninstructional assignments, a public institution of higher education shall credit the employee hour for hour with no adjustment factor.(c) Exemption.--The adjustment factor specified under subsection (a) may not supersede a higher adjustment factor established by a public institution of higher education through a collective bargaining agreement or employer policy in recognition of the amount of out-of-class work that is associated with instruction, including performance of office hours.(d) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Employment certification form." The form used by the United States Department of Education to certify an individual's employment at a public service organization for the purposes of the Public Service Loan Forgiveness Program."Public institution of higher education." Any of the following:(1) A community college operating under Article XIX-A. (2) A rural regional college established under Article XIX-G.(3) A university within the State System of Higher Education under Article XX-A.(4) A State-related institution as defined in section 2001-C.(5) The Thaddeus Stevens College of Technology.(6) The Pennsylvania College of Technology. "Public Service Loan Forgiveness Program." The Public 20250HB1709PN2102 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Service Loan Forgiveness Program established under 34 CFR 685.219 (relating to Public Service Loan Forgiveness Program (PSLF)).Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1709PN2102 - 3 - 1234